src/orthography/allcaps.xfscript
define uppercase [ A|B|C|D|E|F|G|H|I|J|K|L|M|N|O|P|Q|R|S|T|U|V|W|X|Y|Z]
;

define allcaps a (->) A, b (->) B, c (->) C, d (->) D, e (->) E, f
(->) F, g (->) G, h (->) H, i (->) I, j (->) J, k (->) K, l (->) L, m
(->) M, n (->) N, o (->) O, p (->) P, q (->) Q, r (->) R, s (->) S, t
(->) T, u (->) U, v (->) V, w (->) W, x (->) X, y (->) Y, z
(->) Z  \/ .#. uppercase* _ uppercase* .#. ;

push allcaps

! save stack allcaps.fst
